Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-312.01
Registration application; examine for sufficiency.

The office personnel of the election commissioner or county clerk or the deputy registrar shall examine the information provided by the applicant on his or her application for registration and shall determine whether the applicant has provided sufficient information with which to determine his or her qualifications to register to vote.

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 12.